Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF82.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 123A.485, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Aid. (a) Consolidation transition aid is equal to deleted text begin $200deleted text end new text begin $424new text end times the number of resident pupil units in the newly created district in the year of consolidation and deleted text begin $100deleted text end new text begin $212new text end times the number of resident pupil units in the first year following the year of consolidation. The number of pupil units used to calculate aid in either year shall not exceed 1,000 for districts consolidating July 1, 1994, and 1,500 for districts consolidating July 1, 1995, and thereafter. (b) If the total appropriation for consolidation transition aid for any fiscal year, plus any amount transferred under section 127A.41, subdivision 8, is insufficient to pay all districts the full amount of aid earned, the department must first pay the districts in the first year following the year of consolidation the full amount of aid earned and distribute any remaining funds to the newly created districts in the first year of consolidation.